Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
PART 1 Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Compact

Editor’s notes.

The compact provided by this part has been adopted by the number of states required to make the compact effective according to its terms.

27-4-210.
Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Compact.

The Governor of this state is authorized and directed to execute a compact on behalf of the State of Georgia with any one or more of the States of Maine, New Hampshire, Massachusetts, Connecticut, Rhode Island, New York, New Jersey, Delaware, Maryland, Virginia, North Carolina, South Carolina, and Florida, and with such other states as may enter into the compact, legally joining therein the form substantially as follows:

“ATLANTIC STATES MARINE FISHERIES COMPACT.

The contracting states solemnly agree:

Article I.

The purpose of this compact is to promote the better utilization of the fisheries, marine, shell and anadromous, of the Atlantic seaboard by the development of a joint program for the promotion and protection of such fisheries, and by the prevention of the physical waste of the fisheries from any cause. It is not the purpose of this compact to authorize the states joining herein to limit the production of fish or fish products for the purpose of establishing or fixing the price thereof, or creating and perpetuating monopoly.

Article II.

This agreement shall become operative immediately as to those states executing it whenever any two or more of the States of Maine, New Hampshire, Massachusetts, Rhode Island, Connecticut, New York, New Jersey, Delaware, Maryland, Virginia, North Carolina, South Carolina, Georgia, and Florida have executed it in the form that is in accordance with the laws of the executing state and the Congress has given its consent. Any state contiguous with any of the aforementioned states and riparian upon waters frequented by anadromous fish, flowing into waters under the jurisdiction of any of the aforementioned states, may become a party hereto as hereinafter provided.

Article III.

Each state joining herein shall appoint three representatives to a commission hereby constituted and designated as the Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Commission. One shall be the executive officer of the administrative agency of such state charged with the conservation of the fisheries resources to which this compact pertains or, if there be more than one officer or agency, the official of that state named by the governor thereof. The second shall be a member of the legislature of such state designated by the commission or committee on interstate cooperation of such state, or if there be none, or if said commission on interstate cooperation cannot constitutionally designate the said member, such legislator shall be designated by the governor thereof; provided, that if it is constitutionally impossible to appoint a legislator as a commissioner from such state, the second member shall be appointed by the governor of said state in his discretion. The third shall be a citizen who shall have a knowledge or an interest in the marine fisheries problem to be appointed by the governor. This commission shall be a body corporate with the powers and duties set forth herein.

Article IV.

The duty of the said commission shall be to make inquiry and ascertain from time to time such methods, practice, circumstances and conditions as may be disclosed for bringing about the conservation and the prevention of the depletion and physical waste of the fisheries, marine, shell and anadromous, of the Atlantic seaboard. The commission shall have power to recommend the coordination of the exercise of the police powers of the several states within their respective jurisdictions to promote the preservation of those fisheries and their protection against overfishing, waste, depletion or any abuse whatsoever, and to assure a continuing yield from the fisheries resources of the aforementioned states.

To that end the commission shall draft and, after consultation with the advisory committee hereinafter authorized, recommend to the governors and legislatures of the various signatory states legislation dealing with the conservation of the marine, shell and anadromous fisheries of the Atlantic seaboard. The commission shall, more than one month prior to any regular meeting of the legislature in any signatory state, present to the governor of the state its recommendations relating to enactments to be made by the legislature of this compact.

The commission shall consult with and advise the pertinent administrative agencies in the states party hereto with regard to problems connected with the fisheries and recommend the adoption of such regulations as it deems advisable.

The commission shall have power to recommend to the states party hereto the stocking of the waters of such states with fish and fish eggs or joint stocking by some or all of the states party hereto and when two or more of the states shall jointly stock waters the commission shall act as the coordinating agency for such stocking.

Article V.

The commission shall elect from its number a chairman and a vice-chairman and shall appoint and at its pleasure remove or discharge such officers and employees as may be required to carry the provisions of this compact into effect and shall fix and determine their duties, qualifications and compensation. Said commission shall adopt rules and regulations for the conduct of its business. It may establish and maintain one or more offices for the transaction of its business and may meet at any time or place but must meet at least once a year.

Article VI.

No action shall be taken by the commission in regard to its general affairs except by the affirmative vote of a majority of the whole number of compacting states present at any meeting. No recommendation shall be made by the commission in regard to any species of fish except by the affirmative vote of a majority of the compacting states which have an interest in such species. The commission shall define what shall be an interest.

Article VII.

The Fish and Wildlife Service of the Department of the Interior of the Government of the United States shall act as the primary research agency of the Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Commission cooperating with the research agencies in each state for that purpose. Representatives of the said Fish and Wildlife Service shall attend the meetings of the commission.

An advisory committee to be representative of the commercial fisherman and the saltwater anglers and such other interests of each state as the commission deems advisable shall be established by the commission as soon as practical for the purpose of advising the commission upon such recommendations as it may desire to make.

Article VIII.

When any state other than those named specifically in Article II of this compact becomes a party thereto for the purpose of conserving its anadromous fish in accordance with the provisions of Article II, the participation of such state in the action of the commission shall be limited to such species of anadromous fish.

Article IX.

Nothing in this compact shall be construed to limit the powers of any signatory state or to repeal or prevent the enactment of any legislation or the enforcement of any requirement by any signatory state imposing additional conditions and restrictions to conserve its fisheries.

Article X.

Continued absence of representation or of any representative on the commission from any state party hereto shall be brought to the attention of the governor thereof.

Article XI.

The states party hereto agree to make annual appropriations to the support of the commission in proportion to the primary market value of the products of their fisheries, exclusive of cod and haddock, as recorded in the most recent published reports of the Fish and Wildlife Service of the United States Department of the Interior, provided no state shall contribute less than $200 per annum and the annual contribution of each state above the minimum shall be figured to the nearest $100.

The compacting states agree to appropriate initially the annual amounts scheduled below, which amounts are calculated in the manner set forth herein, on the basis of the catch record of 1938. Subsequent budgets shall be recommended by a majority of the commission and the cost thereof allocated equitably among the states in accordance with their respective interests and submitted to the compacting states.

Schedule of Initial Annual State Contributions Maine $ 700.00 New Hampshire 200.00 Massachusetts 2,300.00 Rhode Island 300.00 Connecticut 400.00 New York 1,300.00 New Jersey 800.00 Delaware 200.00 Maryland 700.00 Virginia 1,300.00 North Carolina 600.00 South Carolina 200.00 Georgia 200.00 Florida 1,500.00

Click to view

Article XII.

This compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon each compacting state until renounced by it. Renunciation of this compact must be preceded by sending six months’ notice in writing of intention to withdraw from the compact to the other states party hereto.”

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 117, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 23; Code 1933, § 45-721, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 20.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2003, double quotes were inserted at the beginning and end of this compact.

27-4-211.
Establishment of commission; members; terms of office; removal.

Pursuant to Article III of the compact, there shall be three members (hereinafter called commissioners) of the Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Commission (hereinafter called commission) from the State of Georgia. The first commissioner from the State of Georgia shall be the commissioner of natural resources ex officio; and the term of any such ex officio commissioner shall terminate at the time he ceases to hold the office of commissioner of natural resources; and his successor as commissioner shall be his successor as commissioner of natural resources. The second commissioner from the State of Georgia shall be a legislator and a member of the Commission on Interstate Cooperation of the State of Georgia ex officio, designated by the Commission on Interstate Cooperation; and the term of any such ex officio commissioner shall terminate at the time he ceases to hold such legislative office or office as commissioner on interstate cooperation; and his successor as commissioner shall be named in like manner. The Governor (by and with the advice and consent of the Senate) shall appoint a citizen as a third commissioner who shall have a knowledge of and interest in the marine fisheries problem. The term of the commissioner shall be three years, and he shall hold office until his successor shall be appointed and qualified. Vacancies occurring in the office of the commissioner for any reason or cause shall be filled by appointment by the Governor (by and with the advice and consent of the Senate) for the unexpired term.

The commissioner of natural resources, as ex officio commissioner, may delegate, from time to time, to any deputy or other subordinate in his department or office the power to be present and participate, including voting as his representative or substitute, at any meeting of or hearing by or other proceeding of the commission.

The terms of each of the initial three members shall begin at the date of the appointment of the appointive commissioner, provided the compact shall have then gone into effect in accordance with Article II of the compact; otherwise, they shall begin upon the date upon which the compact shall become effective in accordance with said Article II.

Any commissioner may be removed from office by the Governor upon charges and after a hearing.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 117, § 2; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 23; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1533; Code 1933, § 45-722, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-4-212.
Powers and duties of commission and state officers.

There is granted to the commission and the commissioners thereof all the powers provided for in the compact and all the powers necessary or incidental to the carrying out of the compact in every particular. All officers of the State of Georgia are authorized and directed to do all things falling within their respective provinces and jurisdictions necessary or incidental to the carrying out of the compact in every particular, it being declared to be the policy of the State of Georgia to perform and carry out the compact and to accomplish the purposes thereof. All officers, bureaus, departments, and persons of and in the government or the administration of the State of Georgia are authorized and directed at convenient times and upon request of the commission to furnish the commission with information and data possessed by them and to aid the commission by loan of personnel or other means lying within their legal rights.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 117, § 3; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 23; Code 1933, § 45-723, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-4-213.
Powers granted to commission regarded as supplemental.

Any powers granted to the commission shall be regarded as in aid of and supplemental to and in no case a limitation upon any of the powers vested in the commission by other laws of the State of Georgia or by the laws of the States of Maine, New Hampshire, Massachusetts, Connecticut, Rhode Island, New York, New Jersey, Delaware, Maryland, Virginia, North Carolina, South Carolina, and Florida or by the Congress or the terms of the compact.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 117, § 4; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 23; Code 1933, § 45-724, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-4-214.
Commission to keep accurate accounts; reports to Governor and General Assembly; recommendations for legislative action.

The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements and shall report to the Governor and the General Assembly of the State of Georgia on or before December 10 of each year, setting forth in detail the transactions conducted by it during the 12 months preceding December 1 of that year. The commission shall also make recommendations for any legislative action deemed by it advisable, including amendments to the statutes of the State of Georgia which may be necessary to carry out the intent and purposes of the compact between the signatory states.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 117, § 5; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 23; Code 1933, § 45-725, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-4-215.
Examination of commission’s accounts by state auditor; report to Governor.

The state auditor is authorized and empowered from time to time to examine the accounts and books of the commission, including its receipts, disbursements, and such other items referring to its financial standing as the state auditor may deem proper, and to report the results of the examination to the Governor of the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 117, § 5; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 23; Code 1933, § 45-726, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-4-216.
Annual appropriation for commission.

The sum of $200.00 per annum, or so much as may be necessary, is appropriated, out of any moneys in the state treasury not otherwise appropriated, for the expenses of the commission created by the compact authorized by this part.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 117, § 6; Ga. L. 1945, p. 193, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 23; Code 1933, § 45-727, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.